Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-602
Emergency Firefighting Fund; State Fire Marshal; use; purpose.

Whenever the State Fire Marshal finds that conditions of extreme fire hazard exist he may use the proceeds of the Emergency Firefighting Fund for the purpose of preventing, controlling, or extinguishing any fires that are a hazard to state and private lands within the state.

Laws 1965, c. 190, § 2, p. 581;

Laws 1969, c. 286, § 2, p. 1055.